Maryland, session 2026, HB1344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Transit Administration shall study and make
recommendations regarding the locally operated transit systems throughout the State.
(b) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Administration shall:
(1) examine and evaluate the following for each locally operated transit
system:
(i) the current local and State cost shares;
(ii) the number of riders served; and
(iii) the year–over–year increase in costs over the past 10 years and
the resulting impact of those costs on system operations;
(2) identify and assess best practices from peer states regarding:
(i) local transit funding models; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1344*

HOUSE BILL 1344
(ii) governance structures; and
(3) consult with representatives from local jurisdictions, transit advocacy
organizations, and other relevant stakeholders.
(c) On or before December 1, 2026, the Maryland Transit Administration shall
submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Budget and Taxation
Committee, the House Environment and Transportation Committee, and the House
Appropriations Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.